Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 8 Claims, Priorities, and Accounting in Receiverships

7-1-190.
Preservation of assets; proceedings in lieu of attachment, execution, or repossession.

The status of all parties shall become fixed on the date the department takes possession of a financial institution. No corporation or person shall thereafter acquire any lien or charge against the financial institution for so long as it remains in receivership, provided that nothing in this Code section or elsewhere in this chapter shall be construed to impair any preferred claim arising pursuant to Code Section 11-4-214.

No execution, attachment, or repossession (whether by action or otherwise) shall issue or be proceeded with against any assets owned by or in the custody or possession of a financial institution in receivership. In lieu of the right to issue an attachment or execution against assets of or lawfully in the possession or custody of the financial institution, a plaintiff may proceed by giving written notice of his claim to the department or to the deputy receiver of such financial institution; and he shall thereafter prove his claim in the regular manner prescribed by this chapter. If, in filing its account, the department rejects the claimed right to execution or attachment, the court shall adjudicate the matter as in the case of other disputed claims.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, § 3; Code 1933, § 13-803; Code 1933, § 41A-801, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-191.
Exclusivity of claims procedure; effect of receivership on pending actions.

All claims against the financial institution, action upon which has not been commenced prior to the time the department took possession, shall be presented in the regular manner provided by this chapter for the presentation of claims. Neither a depositor or other creditor of the financial institution nor any other claimant may maintain any action at law or in equity upon such claim, except by regular method provided by this chapter for exceptions to the accounting of the department as receiver. However, an action for the return of specific property or property with respect to which the plaintiff holds a perfected security interest or security title which could have been recovered by the plaintiff from the financial institution in receivership may be maintained in the principal court against the department in its name as receiver of the financial institution. All actions pending against the financial institution when the department takes possession shall be automatically stayed during the receivership, provided that all such actions, except those specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-190, may proceed with prior approval of the principal court.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-802, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-192.
Notice to depositors and other creditors to present claims.

After filing a supplement to the certificate of possession setting forth its determination to liquidate the affairs of a financial institution in receivership, the department shall forthwith give notice of such determination to all corporations or persons who appear upon the books of the financial institution as depositors or other creditors or who are otherwise known to the department to be or who claim to be depositors or other creditors or who have given notice to the department claiming a right of execution or attachment against any assets owned by or legally in the custody or possession of the financial institution.

The notice to depositors shall state the amount which the books or other records of the financial institution show to be due to such depositor. It shall also state that unless such depositor shall, within a specified time, present to the department his bank statement or passbook or other evidence of his account showing a different amount to be due or unless such depositor shall, within a specified time from the date of such notice, otherwise prove in the manner provided by this chapter that a different amount is due, the amount shown to be due by the books of the financial institution will be conclusively presumed to be correct unless the court, pursuant to this chapter, grants him an extension of time.

The notice to each creditor, other than a depositor, shall inform such creditor that he must present his claim in the manner provided by this chapter within a specified time from the date of such notice or else be permanently barred from sharing in any distribution of the assets of the financial institution unless the court, pursuant to this chapter, grants him an extension of time.

The department shall also advertise, in the manner prescribed by this chapter, its determination to liquidate the financial institution. Such advertisement shall state that the department has filed an inventory and appraisement of the assets of the institution and shall designate the superior court with which such documents have been filed and shall describe the legal consequences to depositors and other creditors of failure to prove those claims within the time set in the notice. For purposes of this advertisement and other notices or advertisements required hereunder, the department may, to the extent it deems appropriate, describe shareholders of credit unions as such, not by use of the defined term “depositors” used in this chapter.

The department shall specify as the last day upon which depositors and other creditors can prove their claims a date at least 30 days after the date of the sending of such notice to depositors and creditors. However, claims based upon deficiencies in, or surcharges with respect to, assets which such financial institution held in a fiduciary capacity may be proved at any time within six months after the appointment of a substituted fiduciary of the estate of which such assets were a part and the adjudication of the account of such estate by the competent court.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, § 13; Code 1933, §§ 13-815, 13-816; Code 1933, § 41A-803, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811.

7-1-193.
Proof of claims of depositors.

Any depositor who disagrees with the amount shown by the books or other records of the financial institution to be due to him shall prove his claim by presenting his bank statement or passbook or other documentary indication of indebtedness to the department within the time and in the manner designated by the department pursuant to this chapter. Any such depositor who shall not have received or shall have lost his bank statement or passbook or other documentary evidence or who shall believe that the amount shown to be due him by such bank statement or passbook or other documentary evidence is incorrect shall, within the time designated by the department, present his claim to the department by whatever method, including affidavits, the department shall designate.

Any depositor who shall not present his claim within the designated time and in the manner provided by this Code section shall be bound by the amount appearing to be due to him upon the books or records of the financial institution or, where the name of such depositor does not appear at all upon the books or records of the financial institution or appears on such books or records but with no balance appearing to be due to him by the financial institution, shall be permanently barred from sharing in any distribution of the assets of the financial institution. However, the principal court may, upon petition and adequate cause shown, permit any depositor to file his claim at a later date, but no claim shall in any event be allowed to be filed after the last day for the filing of exceptions to the first account of the department.

This Code section shall not, however, be construed to deprive any depositor of any right of action at law or in equity which he may have against an officer or employee or former officer or employee of the financial institution or upon the bond of such officer or employee or former officer or employee for any act committed by such officer or employee which resulted in such depositor’s name not appearing upon the books of the financial institution or appearing upon them but being credited with an amount below that actually due.

The department shall prescribe the form for the proof of claim of all depositors and for an affidavit as to the truth of statements therein to be included with the claim. Whenever requested by any such depositor to prepare such proof of claim or to take the affidavit thereto, the department may do so without any charge to such depositor if the department concludes that it would be burdensome or difficult for the depositor to prepare the proof.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, § 18; Ga. L. 1925, p. 119, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-820; Code 1933, § 41A-804, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-194.
Proof of claims of creditors.

Creditors other than depositors shall not share in any distribution of the assets of the financial institution unless the creditor or his designated representative shall, within the time and in the manner specified by the department pursuant to this chapter, present to the department a statement of his claim, together with a copy of any book entries pertaining thereto, any evidence of indebtedness or other instrument received as evidence thereof, the details with respect to any collateral or agreement of pledge received in connection therewith, and a description of any insurance pertaining thereto. The department shall prescribe the form for the proof of claim of creditors and for affidavit as to the truth of statements therein to be included with the claim. However, the court may, upon petition and adequate cause shown, permit any creditor to file his claim upon a later date, but no claim shall in any event be allowed to be filed after the last day for the filing of exceptions to the first account of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, § 18; Ga. L. 1925, p. 119, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-820; Code 1933, § 41A-805, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-195.
Allowance of claims.

For the purposes of the accounting provided for in this chapter, the department shall allow the claims of depositors for the amounts shown to be due to them upon the books or other records of the financial institution (unless it determines such books or records to be in error) or for such other amounts as they shall, within the time and in the manner provided by this chapter, prove to the satisfaction of the department are due to them. It shall likewise allow the claims of all other creditors, when presented within the time and in the manner provided by this chapter, if it shall be satisfied that the amounts claimed are rightfully due. In allowing claims, the department may change their rank to that which it determines to be proper and may reduce them by exercise of the financial institution’s right of setoff against the claimant. It shall reject all other claims of depositors and other creditors.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, § 15; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 4; Code 1933, § 13-817; Code 1933, § 41A-806, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-196.
Advance payment of dividends to depositors.

After filing a supplement to the certificate of possession setting forth its determination to liquidate the affairs of the financial institution, the department may, without leave of court and without filing an account, make an advance payment of a dividend to all depositors the amounts of whose claims, as they appear upon the books or other records of the financial institution, are undisputed. The dividend shall be calculated as if the claims of all other depositors, as they appear upon the books or other records of the financial institution, and the claims of all creditors or other corporations or persons who assert priority over or parity with depositors in the order of distribution of the assets, were valid and uncontested.

However, the department shall not make such an advance payment of a dividend to any depositor until it shall have set aside an amount sufficient to pay in full the claims of all creditors or other corporations or persons asserting or entitled to priority over depositors in the order of distribution and to pay the proportionate dividend on the amounts claimed by the other depositors and by any creditors or other corporations or persons who are entitled to or who claim parity with depositors in the order of distribution provided for by law. The department shall likewise set aside, before making such advance payment, such amount as it shall deem necessary for the expenses of administration of the receivership.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, § 21; Code 1933, § 13-823; Code 1933, § 41A-807, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-197.
Expenses of administration.

Any reasonable expenditure made by the department as receiver of a financial institution, including any expense incurred in the management, reorganization, consolidation, liquidation, or distribution of the assets and affairs of the financial institution, any payment of a loan or interest thereon under Code Section 7-1-164, and any compensation paid to the deputy receiver, attorneys, or any other person employed to assist the department in such management, reorganization, consolidation, liquidation, or distribution shall be paid out of the assets of the financial institution, provided it is included in any partial or final account filed by the department pursuant to this chapter and is approved by the principal court in which such account is filed. Where such expenses are incurred or such compensation is paid for the benefit of the estate of more than one financial institution in the possession of the department as receiver, an equitable portion of such expenses or compensation shall be paid out of the assets of each financial institution on whose behalf such expenditures were incurred or paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, § 23; Ga. L. 1925, p. 119, § 1; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 91; Code 1933, § 13-825; Code 1933, § 41A-808, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-198.
Filing or ordering partial or final account; notice of filing; exceptions.

At any time after the expiration of the period fixed by the department for the presentation of claims, it may file a partial account of its administration of the business and property of the financial institution, duly verified under oath or affirmation, with the principal court. If the department does not file its first account within one year after it takes possession of a financial institution, any depositor, other creditor, or shareholder of such financial institution may petition the court to order the department to file an account. The court may, in its discretion, grant or refuse the petition. Whenever it becomes economically advisable to wind up finally the affairs of a financial institution in liquidation, the department shall file with the principal court its final account, duly verified under oath or affirmation. The clerk of the principal court shall not be under any duty to recopy or otherwise to record any account and shall make no charge except the regular fee for filing such or similar papers.

The account shall present the department’s administration of the estate, including a statement of all receipts or expenditures, a list of all claims which have been allowed, and a separate list of claims which have been objected to or are disputed, showing as to all depositors and other creditors, their names and addresses, the amounts due or claimed to be due to them, and any priorities in the order of distribution granted to or claimed by them. A final account need not present matters previously settled incident to partial accounts.

The department shall forthwith give written or printed notice of the filing of an account to all corporations or persons whom it knows to be, or who claim to be depositors or other creditors or who have given to it notice claiming a right of attachment or execution. Such notice shall also state that unless an exception to the account or to any item therein is filed with the principal court within 30 days from the date of the filing thereof, it will be confirmed absolutely. The department shall also advertise such notice in a newspaper or newspapers as provided in this chapter, stating the date upon which it has filed its partial or final account and that all exceptions to the account must be filed within 30 days from the date of the filing of the account. The department shall forthwith file with the court, under oath or affirmation, a statement that it has, in the manner provided by this chapter, sent both the notice of its determination to liquidate and the notice of its filing of an account to all corporations or persons entitled thereto. The department shall also file the proofs of publication of the advertisements required by this Code section.

Any corporation or person who is or who claims to be a depositor, other creditor, or shareholder of a financial institution or who has given to the department notice of his claim to the right of execution or attachment or who asserts any other type of claim against a financial institution may, within 30 days after the filing of an account by the department, file in the principal court specific exceptions in writing, under oath or affirmation, to such account or to any item therein. Notice of any exception to an individual item in an account shall forthwith be personally served upon or sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the corporation or person whose claim is thus objected to or his counsel and also the department or the deputy receiver managing the affairs of the particular financial institution or the counsel of either. Affidavit of the serving or sending of such notice shall forthwith be filed with the court.

Whenever an exception is filed to any expenditure made by the department as an expense of administration, the department shall keep an accurate record of the salaries and other expenses properly incurred by it in the contesting of such exception. If the exception is overruled and the expenditure is sustained, the court may, in its discretion, assess such expenses and salaries, together with the regular costs provided by law, upon the depositor, other creditor, or shareholder filing such exception.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, §§ 15-17; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, §§ 4, 4A; Code 1933, §§ 13-817, 13-818, 13-819; Code 1933, § 41A-809, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

7-1-199.
Adjudication of rejected claims and exceptions to account.

If any claim has been rejected by the department or any exception has been filed to the account or to any item thereof, the principal court shall, as soon as expedient after the expiration of the period for the filing of exceptions to the account, fix a date for hearing in court arguments on all rejected claims and all exceptions to the account or to any item thereof. The department shall give notice of such hearing to all corporations or persons whose claims have been rejected by the department or objected to in the manner provided by this chapter. It shall likewise give notice to all corporations or persons who have filed exceptions to the account or to any item thereof. Such notice shall set forth, insofar as possible, the reasons for the rejection of the claim or the nature of the exception to the item of the account and shall state that all parties whose claims are rejected or objected to must appear in the principal court upon the date fixed by the court to prove their claims or they will be bound by the ex parte decision of the court.

The principal court in which the account is filed shall itself hear arguments upon any rejected claim or upon any exception to an account, or to any item thereof, upon the date fixed by it for this purpose. The court shall itself decide, without delay, all matters in controversy. If any party does not appear in court on the day fixed, the court shall conduct the hearing ex parte and shall render its decision upon the merits as they appear after such hearing.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-810, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-200.
Confirmation of account; distribution of dividends; final disposition of assets insufficient for distribution; cancellation of articles.

If the department has approved all depositors’ claims, as proved by them pursuant to this chapter or if not proved as they appear upon the books or other records of the financial institution and if no exception has been filed to an account or to any item thereof within 30 days after the filing of such account by the department, the principal court shall confirm the account absolutely. If any funds are available for distribution, the department shall then declare and pay out of such funds a partial or a final dividend, according to the priorities established by law. If the department has rejected any deposit or claim or if any exception has been filed, the court shall confirm the account as to all other matters and claims. The department may then declare and pay out of the funds available for distribution, if any, a dividend, according to the priorities established by law. The dividend shall be calculated as if all deposits and other claims were valid and approved. The department, before paying any such dividend, shall set apart funds or assets sufficient to pay required distribution on any claim still being asserted which has been rejected or reduced in priority by the department or to which an exception has been filed if the amount and the priority claimed were sustained by the court. If any such claim shall be determined by the court to be valid, the department shall pay to the corporation or person entitled thereto the dividend which has been set apart in the manner provided by this Code section. If any such claim shall be determined by the court to be invalid, the dividend which has been set apart in the manner provided by this Code section shall be distributed in the order of the priorities established by law to those whose claims have been approved by the court; provided, however, that any final determination as to disputed claims may be appealed as provided by law and payments may be withheld pending the results of the appeal.

The confirmation of any account after the adjudication of all claims therein which have been rejected or reduced in priority by the department or to which exceptions have been filed and of all other exceptions to such account shall be conclusive as to all matters therein. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no claim of any depositor or other creditor shall be valid if not listed and approved in the first account which has been filed. The confirmation of the final account and distribution thereunder shall discharge the department, the commissioner, the deputy receiver, any other employee, and the legal counsel, as well as the surety for any of them, from all further civil liability for any act done in an official capacity with respect to the receivership.

Upon confirmation of the final account the department may impound the balance of the assets, including real property, remaining in its hands and shall not be obligated to sell such assets or actively to collect on the impounded assets. With regard to said assets, including real estate and including after-discovered assets, it shall, however, retain all of its powers to receive payment for them or, with leave of court, to adjust or compromise them. After its final accounting and discharge, the department shall have power to make further distribution to the creditors, depositors, and shareholders when, in its opinion, sufficient funds are realized to justify such distribution after deducting reasonable costs for collection, preservation, and distribution. If the department is of the opinion that the funds collected or probably to be collected will be insufficient to make a distribution practicable and that all interested claimants will not in the future have their claims satisfied, it shall, after deducting reasonable costs for collection and preservation, hold the remainder of such property subject to Article 5 of Chapter 12 of Title 44. Thereafter, the articles of incorporation or charter shall no longer be valid and the department shall notify the Secretary of State that the receivership has been concluded. The Secretary of State shall promptly cancel such articles or charter of record in that office.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, § 21; Code 1933, § 13-823; Code 1933, § 41A-811, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 972, § 4.

7-1-201.
Unclaimed dividends.

Whenever a dividend remains unclaimed six months after it has been declared and the department is unable to locate the depositor or other claimant to whom said dividend was payable, the dividend shall become a part of the general assets of the financial institution and be distributed as other assets.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, § 24; Ga. L. 1925, p. 119, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-826; Code 1933, § 41A-812, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-202.
Order of payment of liabilities; secured or preferred claims and liens.

In the distribution of the assets of a financial institution which is liquidated or dissolved, whether under this chapter or by any other method, the order of payment of liabilities of the financial institution in the event that its assets are insufficient to pay in full all its liabilities for which claims are duly made shall be:

First, the payment of costs and expenses of administration of the liquidation or dissolution;

Second, the payment of debts due depositors;

Third, the payment of all state taxes;

Fourth, judgments;

Fifth, contractual obligations;

Sixth, unliquidated claims for damages and the like;

Seventh, capital securities.

Nothing in this chapter shall impair the validity or the priority otherwise accorded by law to any security interest, security title, preferred claim arising under Code Section 11-4-214, or any lien arising by force of law; provided, however, any of the foregoing may be delayed in payment by the principal court until costs of administration including loans or interest payments under Code Section 7-1-164 or the costs of selling or otherwise disposing of assets under this chapter have been met in any case where the principal court determines that the claimant of the security interest, security title, preferred claim, or lien has expressly or impliedly consented to the administrative activities involved or has benefited from such activities.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, § 19; Ga. L. 1925, p. 119, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 5; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 91; Code 1933, § 13-821; Code 1933, § 41A-813, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

Cross references.

Priority of payment of notes, debentures, and other instruments issued by a bank or trust company which becomes insolvent or is liquidated, §

7-1-419

.

7-1-203.
Subrogation of insurer of deposits or shares.

Where the deposits or shares of a financial institution are insured by a federal public body or otherwise, the claims of depositors shall be subrogated in favor of said insurer to the extent that it pays or makes available for payment claims of such depositors against the financial institution, provided that the rights of such depositors to receive dividends or other distributions upon that portion of their claims not made available for payment shall not be affected by such subrogation.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-814, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-204.
Liquidation of excess assets by trustees.

If any unliquidated assets remain in the department’s possession after the filing and confirmation of its final account, the payment in full of the claims of all depositors, creditors, and other claimants which have been approved by the court and the distribution to shareholders of any cash balance remaining thereafter, it shall call a meeting of all the shareholders of the financial institution by giving them written notice at least 30 days before the day fixed for the meeting. At such meeting, the shareholders shall elect by ballot a trustee or trustees, who shall complete the liquidation. A majority of the shares present in person or by proxy shall be necessary to elect such trustee or trustees. The department shall file a certified copy of the minutes of said meeting with the principal court. If no trustee is elected in this manner on the day designated, the department shall petition the principal court for the appointment of a trustee or trustees. The trustee or trustees who are thus elected by the shareholders or appointed by the court shall give bond to the state, in such amount, with such surety, and under such conditions as the court may direct. The department shall then transfer to such trustee or trustees all the assets of the financial institution which are still in its possession. After such transfer by the department to a trustee or trustees for the benefit of the shareholders, the financial institution shall have no corporate powers or privileges whatsoever, except that its shareholders may elect a successor trustee or trustees upon death, removal, or inability of the first trustee or trustees to act. The trustee or trustees shall not succeed to any powers or privileges except such as shall be necessary to the liquidation of the remaining assets which have been transferred to such trustee or trustees by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 7, §§ 24-27; Code 1933, §§ 13-827, 13-828, 13-829; Code 1933, § 41A-815, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-205.
Destruction of records.

The department is authorized to destroy all records of the financial institution of which it was in possession as receiver and all records of such receivership at the expiration of six years from the date of the absolute confirmation of its final account, except where any provision of this chapter expressly provides a different method for the disposition of the records or a longer period for their preservation.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-816, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.